Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Salary Scales.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, §§ 170-175.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 315 et seq.

Services included in computing period of service for purpose of. 2 ALR2d 1033.

Sec. 14.20.220.
School experience for salary scales.

[Repealed, § 52 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

[Repealed, § 52 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

[Repealed, § 52 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

[Repealed, § 35 ch 46 SLA 1970.]

For teachers holding bachelors’ degrees, not more than six years of school experience outside the state may be substituted for a like period of school experience in the state when a teacher’s position on the salary scale is established, and, for teachers holding masters’ degrees, not more than eight years of school experience outside the state may be substituted for a like period of school experience in the state when a teacher’s position on the salary scale is established.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 37 SLA 1986.]

In this section, “school experience” means a full-time elementary or secondary teacher in a public or nonpublic school as defined in AS

14.25.220

.

History.

(§ 37-6-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 176 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 179 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 160 SLA 1966; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 208 SLA 1968; am §§ 1, 2 ch 209 SLA 1968; am §§ 16, 35 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 229 SLA 1970; am § 52 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 23 ch 37 SLA 1986)

Sec. 14.20.230.
Administrators’ salaries. [Repealed, § 52 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

Secs. 14.20.240 — 14.20.270.
Salaries; reimbursement by state to school districts; limitation on higher salaries not prohibited; determination of number of teachers, superintendents, principals and vice principals for which district entitled to reimbursement. [Repealed, § 6 ch 229 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 14.20.275.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 52 ch 6 SLA 1984.]